District of Columbia statutes.
21-310

Single custodianship.

A transfer shall be made only for 1 minor, and only 1 person may be the custodian. All custodial property held under this chapter by the same custodian for the benefit of the same minor constitutes a single custodianship.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
1981 Ed., § 21-310.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.